Idaho statutes. Title 15 UNIFORM PROBATE CODE
Part 1
Multiple-Party Accounts

§ 15-6-101. Definitions.

In this Part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Account” means a contract of deposit of funds between a depositor and a financial institution, and includes a checking account, savings account, certificate of deposit, share account and other like arrangement;

“Beneficiary” means a person named in a trust account as one for whom a party to the account is named as trustee;

“Financial institution” means any organization authorized to do business under state or federal laws relating to financial institutions, including, without limitation, banks and trust companies, savings banks, building and loan associations, savings and loan companies or associations, and credit unions;

“Joint account” means an account payable on request to one (1) or more of two (2) or more parties whether or not mention is made of any right of survivorship;

A “multiple-party account” is any of the following types of account:

a joint account;

a P.O.D. account; or

a trust account.

“Net contribution” of a party to a joint account as of any given time is the sum of all deposits thereto made by or for him, less all withdrawals made by or for him which have not been paid to or applied to the use of any other party, plus a pro rata share of any interest or dividends included in the current balance. The term includes, in addition, any proceeds of deposit life insurance added to the account by reason of the death of the party whose net contribution is in question;

“Party” means a person who, by the terms of the account, has a present right, subject to request, to payment from a multiple-party account. A P.O.D. payee or beneficiary of a trust account is a party only after the account becomes payable to him by reason of his surviving the original payee or trustee. Unless the context otherwise requires, it includes a guardian, conservator, personal representative, or assignee, including an attaching creditor, of a party. It also includes a person identified as a trustee of an account for another whether or not a beneficiary is named, but it does not include any named beneficiary unless he has a present right of withdrawal;

“Payment” of sums on deposit includes withdrawal, payment on check or other directive of a party, and any pledge of sums on deposit by a party and any set-off, or reduction or other disposition of all or part of an account pursuant to a pledge;

“Proof of death” includes a death certificate or record or report which is prima facie proof of death under section 15-1-107[, Idaho Code,] of this code;

“P.O.D. account” means an account payable on request to one (1) person during his lifetime and on his death to one (1) or more P.O.D. payees, or to one (1) or more persons during their lifetimes and on the death of all of them to one (1) or more P.O.D. payees;

“P.O.D. payee” means a person designated on a P.O.D. account as one to whom the account is payable on request after the death of one (1) or more persons;

“Request” means a proper request for withdrawal, or a check or order for payment, which complies with all conditions of the account, including special requirements concerning necessary signatures and regulations of the financial institutions; but if the financial institution conditions withdrawal or payment on advance notice, for purposes of this part the request for withdrawal or payment is treated as immediately effective and a notice of intent to withdraw is treated as a request for withdrawal;

“Sums on deposit” means the balance payable on a multiple-party account including interest, dividends, and in addition any deposit life insurance proceeds added to the account by reason of the death of a party;

“Trust account” means an account in the name of one (1) or more parties as trustee for one (1) or more beneficiaries where the relationship is established by the form of the account and the deposit agreement with the financial institution and there is no subject of the trust other than the sums on deposit in the account; it is not essential that payment to the beneficiary be mentioned in the deposit agreement. A trust account does not include a regular trust account under a testamentary trust or a trust agreement which has significance apart from the account, or a fiduciary account arising from a fiduciary relation such as attorney-client;

“Withdrawal” includes payment to a third person pursuant to check or other directive of a party.

It does not include accounts established for deposit of funds of a partnership, joint venture, or other association for business purposes, or accounts controlled by one (1) or more persons as the duly authorized agent or trustee for a corporation, unincorporated association, charitable or civic organization or a regular fiduciary or trust account where the relationship is established other than by deposit agreement;

§ 15-6-102. Ownership as between parties, and others — Protection of financial institutions.

The provisions of sections 15-6-103 through 15-6-105[, Idaho Code,] of this Part concerning beneficial ownership as between parties, or as between parties and P.O.D. payees or beneficiaries of multiple-party accounts, are relevant only to controversies between these persons and their creditors and other successors, and have no bearing on the power of withdrawal of these persons as determined by the terms of account contracts. The provisions of sections 15-6-108 through 15-6-113[, Idaho Code,] of this Part govern the liability of financial institutions who make payments pursuant thereto, and their set-off rights.

§ 15-6-103. Ownership during lifetime.

A joint account belongs, during the lifetime of all parties, to the parties in proportion to the net contributions by each to the sums on deposit, unless there is clear and convincing evidence of a different intent.

A P.O.D. account belongs to the original payee during his lifetime and not to the P.O.D. payee or payees; if two (2) or more parties are named as original payees, during their lifetimes rights as between them are governed by subsection (a) of this section.

Unless a contrary intent is manifested by the terms of the account or the deposit agreement or there is other clear and convincing evidence of an irrevocable trust, a trust account belongs beneficially to the trustee during his lifetime, and if two (2) or more parties are named as trustee on the account, during their lifetimes beneficial rights as between them are governed by subsection (a) of this section. If there is an irrevocable trust, the account belongs beneficially to the beneficiary.

§ 15-6-104. Right of survivorship.

Sums remaining on deposit at the death of a party to a joint account belong to the surviving party or parties as against the estate of the decedent if an intent to give the account can be shown by the surviving party or parties. If there are two (2) or more surviving parties, their respective ownerships during lifetime shall be in proportion to their previous ownership interests under section 15-6-103[, Idaho Code,] of this Part augmented by an equal share for each survivor of any interest the decedent may have owned in the account immediately before his death; and the right of survivorship continues between the surviving parties.

If the account is a P.O.D. account, on death of the original payee or of the survivor of two (2) or more original payees, any sums remaining on deposit belong to the P.O.D. payee or payees if surviving, or to the survivor of them if one (1) or more die before the original payee; if two (2) or more P.O.D. payees survive, there is no right of survivorship in event of death of a P.O.D. payee thereafter unless the terms of the account or deposit agreement expressly provide for survivorship between them.

If the account is a trust account, on death of the trustee or the survivor of two (2) or more trustees, any sums remaining on deposit belong to the person or persons named as beneficiaries, if surviving, or to the survivor of them if one (1) or more die before the trustee, unless there is clear and convincing evidence of a contrary intent; if two (2) or more beneficiaries survive, there is no right of survivorship in event of death of any beneficiary thereafter unless the terms of the account or deposit agreement expressly provide for survivorship between them.

In other cases, the death of any party to a multiple-party account has no effect on beneficial ownership of the account other than to transfer the rights of the decedent as part of his estate.

A right of survivorship arising from the express terms of the account or under this section, if an intent to give can be shown, a beneficiary designation in a trust account, or a P.O.D. payee designation, cannot be changed by will.

§ 15-6-105. Effect of written notice to financial institution.

The provisions of section 15-6-104[, Idaho Code,] of this Part as to rights of survivorship are determined by the form of the account at the death of a party. This form may be altered by written order given by a party to the financial institution to change the form of the account or to stop or vary payment under the terms of the account. The order or request must be signed by a party, received by the financial institution during the party’s lifetime, and not countermanded by other written order of the same party during his lifetime.

§ 15-6-106. Accounts and transfers nontestamentary.

Any transfers resulting from the application of section 15-6-104[, Idaho Code,] of this chapter are effective by reason of the account contracts involved and this statute and are not to be considered as testamentary or subject to chapters 1 through 4[, title 15, Idaho Code,] of this code.

§ 15-6-107. Liability of nonprobate transferees for creditor claims and statutory allowances.

In this section, “nonprobate transfer” means a valid transfer effective at death, other than of a survivorship interest in a joint tenancy of real estate, by a transferor whose last domicile was in this state to the extent that the transferor immediately before death had power, acting alone, to prevent the transfer by revocation or withdrawal and instead to use the property for the benefit of the transferor to apply it to discharge claims against the transferor’s probate estate.

Except as otherwise provided by statute, a transferee of a nonprobate transfer is subject to liability to the decedent’s probate estate for allowed claims against the decedent’s probate estate and statutory allowances to the decedent’s surviving spouse, minor children and dependent children to the extent the decedent’s probate estate is insufficient to satisfy those claims and allowances. The liability of a nonprobate transferee may not exceed the value of nonprobate transfers received or controlled by that transferee.

Nonprobate transferees are liable for the insufficiency described in subsection (2) of this section in the following order:

As provided in the decedent’s will or any other governing instrument;

To the extent of the value of the nonprobate transfer received or controlled by the trustee of a trust serving as the principal nonprobate instrument in the decedent’s estate plan as shown by its designation as devisee of the decedent’s residuary estate or by other facts or circumstances;

Other nonprobate transferees, in proportion to the values received.

Unless otherwise provided by the trust instrument, interests of beneficiaries in all trusts incurring liabilities under this section shall abate as necessary to satisfy the liability as if all of the trust instruments were a single will and the interests were devises under it.

A provision made in one (1) instrument may direct the apportionment of the liability among the nonprobate transferees taking under that or any other governing instrument. If a provision in one (1) instrument conflicts with a provision in another, the later one prevails.

Upon due notice to a nonprobate transferee, the liability imposed by this section is enforceable in proceedings in this state, wherever the transferee is located.

A proceeding under this section may not be commenced unless the personal representative of the decedent’s estate has received from the surviving spouse or one acting for a minor or dependent child, to the extent that statutory allowances are affected, or a creditor, a written demand for the proceeding. If the personal representative declines or fails to commence a proceeding after demand, a person making demand may commence the proceeding in the name of the decedent’s estate, at the expense of the person making the demand and not of the estate. A personal representative who declines in good faith to commence a requested proceeding incurs no personal liability for declining.

A proceeding under this section must be commenced within two (2) years after the decedent’s death, but a proceeding on behalf of a creditor whose claim was allowed after proceedings challenging disallowance of the claim may be commenced within sixty (60) days after final allowance of the claim.
(9) Unless a written notice asserting that a decedent’s probate estate is insufficient to pay allowed claims and statutory allowances has been received from the decedent’s personal representative the following rules apply:

Payment or delivery of assets by a financial institution, registrar or other obligor to a nonprobate transferee in accordance with the terms of the governing instrument controlling the transfer releases the obligor from all claims for amounts paid or assets delivered.

A trustee receiving or controlling a nonprobate transfer is released from liability under this section on any assets distributed to the trust’s beneficiaries. Each beneficiary to the extent of the distribution received becomes liable for the amount of the trustee’s liability attributable to that asset imposed by subsections (2) and (3) of this section.

§ 15-6-108. Financial institution protection — Payment on signature of one party.

Financial institutions may enter into multiple-party accounts to the same extent that they may enter into single-party accounts. Any multiple-party account may be paid, on request, to any one (1) or more of the parties. A financial institution shall not be required to inquire as to the source of funds received for deposit to a multiple-party account, or to inquire as to the proposed application of any sum withdrawn from an account, for purposes of establishing net contributions.

§ 15-6-109. Financial institution protection — Payment after death or disability — Joint account.

Any sums in a joint account may be paid, on request, to any party without regard to whether any other party is incapacitated or deceased at the time the payment is demanded; but payment may not be made to the personal representative or heirs of a deceased party unless proofs of death are presented to the financial institution showing that the decedent was the last surviving party or unless there is no right of survivorship under section 15-6-104[, Idaho Code,] of this Part.

§ 15-6-110. Financial institution protection — Payment of P.O.D. account.

Any P.O.D. account may be paid, on request, to any original party to the account. Payment may be made, on request, to the P.O.D. payee or to the personal representative or heirs of a deceased P.O.D. payee upon presentation to the financial institution of proof of death showing that the P.O.D. payee survived all persons named as original payees. Payment may be made to the personal representative or heirs of a deceased original payee if proof of death is presented to the financial institution showing that his decedent was the survivor of all other persons named on the account either as an original payee or as P.O.D. payee.

§ 15-6-111. Financial institution protection — Payment of trust account.

Any trust account may be paid, on request, to any trustee. Unless the financial institution has received written notice that the beneficiary has a vested interest not dependent upon his surviving the trustee, payment may be made to the personal representative or heirs of a deceased trustee if proof of death is presented to the financial institution showing that his decedent was the survivor of all other persons named on the account either as trustee or beneficiary. Payment may be made, on request, to the beneficiary upon presentation to the financial institution of proof of death showing that the beneficiary or beneficiaries survived all persons named as trustees.

§ 15-6-112. Financial institution protection — Discharge.

Payment made pursuant to sections [section] 15-6-108, 15-6-109, 15-6-110 or 15-6-111[, Idaho Code,] of this Part discharges the financial institution from all claims for amounts so paid whether or not the payment is consistent with the beneficial ownership of the account as between parties, P.O.D. payees, or beneficiaries, or their successors. The protection here given does not extend to payments made after a financial institution has received written notice from any party able to request present payment to the effect that withdrawals in accordance with the terms of the account should not be permitted. Unless the notice is withdrawn by the person giving it, the successor of any deceased party must concur in any demand for withdrawal if the financial institution is to be protected under this section. No other notice or any other information shown to have been available to a financial institution shall affect its right to the protection provided here. The protection here provided shall have no bearing on the rights of parties in disputes between themselves or their successors concerning the beneficial ownership of funds in, or withdrawn from, multiple-party accounts.

§ 15-6-113. Financial institution protection — Setoff.

Without qualifying any other statutory right to setoff or lien and subject to any contractual provision, if a party to a multiple-party account is indebted to a financial institution, the financial institution has a right to setoff against the account in which the party has or had immediately before his death a present right of withdrawal. The amount of the account subject to setoff is that proportion to which the debtor is, or was immediately before his death, beneficially entitled, and in the absence of proof of net contributions, to an equal share with all parties having present rights of withdrawal.

§ 15-6-114. Community property.

A deposit of community property in an account does not alter the community character of the property or community rights in the property, but a right of survivorship between parties married to each other arising from the express terms of the account or of the provisions of this chapter may not be altered by will.